pt-PT: Teor de gordura: Magro; Com gordura; Baixo teor de gordura; Teor de gordura reduzido; Semidesnatado; Desnatado; Gordo; Outro
en: Fat content: Fat-free; Full fat; Low fat; Reduced fat; Semi-skimmed; Skimmed; Whole; Other
pl: Zawartość tłuszczu: Beztłuszczowa; Pełnotłusta; Niskotłuszczowa; O obniżonej zawartości tłuszczu; Półtłuste; Odtłuszczone; Całe; Inne
cs: Obsah tuku: Bez tuku; Plnotučné; Nízkotučné; Snížený obsah tuku; Polotučné; Odstředěné; Celé; Jiné
fr: Teneur en matières grasses: Sans graisse; Matières grasses; Faible en graisse; Allégé; Demi-écrémé; Écrémé; Entier; Autre
sk-SK: Obsah tuku: Bez tuku; Plný tuk; Nízky obsah tuku; Znížený obsah tuku; Polotučný; Odstredený; Celý; Iné
ro-RO: Conținut de grăsime: Fără grăsimi; Conținut integral de grăsimi; Conținut scăzut de grăsimi; Conținut redus de grăsimi; Semi-degresat; Degresat; Integral; Altele
ru: Содержание жиров: Обезжиренный; Необезжиренный; Низкое содержание жира; Пониженное содержание жира; Полуобезжиренный; Обезжиренный; Цельный; Другой
tr: Yağ İçeriği: Yağsız; Tam yağlı; Az yağlı; Yağı azaltılmış; Yarım yağlı; Kaymaksız; Tüm; Diğer
fi: Rasvapitoisuus: Rasvaton; Täysirasvainen; Vähärasvainen; Vähennetty rasva; Puolirasvainen; Rasvaton; Kokonainen; Muu
sl-SI: Vsebnost maščobe: Brez maščob; Polnomasten; Malo maščob; Zmanjšana maščoba; Delno posneto; Posneto; Polnomastno; Drugo
lt-LT: Riebalų kiekis: Be riebalų; Didelis riebalų kiekis; Mažai riebalų; Mažiau riebalų; Pusiau nugriebtas; Nugriebtas; Riebus; Kita
de: Fettgehalt: Fettfrei; Vollfett; Fettarm; Fettreduziert; Teilentrahmt; Entrahmt; Ganz; Sonstiges
el: Περιεκτικότητα σε λιπαρά: Χωρίς λιπαρά; Πλήρη λιπαρά; Χαμηλή σε λιπαρά; Μειωμένα λιπαρά; Ημιαποβουτυρωμένο; Αποβουτυρωμένο; Πλήρες; Άλλο
da: Fedtindhold: Fedtfri; Fuldt fedtindhold; Lavt fedtindhold; Reduceret fedtindhold; Halvskummet; Skummet; Hel; Andet
zh-CN: 脂肪含量: 不含脂肪; 全脂; 低脂; 减脂; 半脱脂; 脱脂; 全脂; 其他
es: Contenido en grasas: Sin grasa; Entero; Bajo en grasa; Reducida en grasa; Semidesnatada; Desnatado; Entero; Otros
nl: Vetgehalte: Vetvrij; Volvet; Mager; Verminderd vet; Halfvol; Mager; Geheel; Andere
zh-TW: 脂肪含量: 無脂; 全脂; 低脂; 降脂; 半脫脂; 脫脂; 全部; 其他
hu: Zsírtartalom: Zsírmentes; Zsíros; Zsírszegény; Csökkentett zsírtartalmú; Félig lefölözött; Lefölözött; Teljes; Egyéb
bg-BG: Съдържание на мазнини: Без мазнини; Пълномаслен; Ниско съдържание на мазнини; Намалено съдържание на мазнини; Полуобезмаслен; Обезмаслен; Цяло; Други
vi: Hàm lượng chất béo: Không chứa chất béo; Nguyên béo; Ít béo; Giảm béo; Ít chất béo; Tách béo; Nguyên; Khác
hr-HR: Udio masti: Bez masnoća; Punomasno; Niska količina masnoća; Smanjena količina masnoća; Poluobrano; Obrano; Cjelovito; Ostalo
ko: 지방 함량: 무지방; 전지방; 저지방; 지방 감소; 반탈지; 탈지; 전체; 기타
th: ปริมาณไขมัน: ปราศจากไขมัน; เต็มส่วน; ไขมันต่ำ; ไขมันต่ำกว่า; พร่องมันเนย; ขาดมันเนย; ทั้งชิ้น; อื่นๆ
nb: Fettinnhold: Fettfri; Full fett; Lite fett; Redusert fett; Halvskummet; Skummet; Hel; Annet
sv: Fetthalt: Fettfri; Fullt fett; Låg fetthalt; Reducerad fetthalt; Halvskummad; Skummad; Hel; Övrigt
pt-BR: Teor de gordura: Não contém gorduras; Gordo; Baixo teor de gordura; Teor reduzido de gordura; Semi-desnatado; Desnatado; Integral; Outro
ja: 脂肪分: 無脂肪; 全脂肪; 低脂肪; 低脂肪; 部分脱脂; 脱脂; 全体; その他
it: Contenuto di grassi: Senza grassi; Grasso; Pochi grassi; A ridotto contenuto di grassi; Parzialmente scremato; Scremato; Intero; Altro